Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4062.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 6a. (1) A member of the Michigan senate or house of representatives who resigns from office before January 1, 2027 shall not make expenditures for or receive compensation or reimbursement for actual expenses for lobbying for the remainder of the term of office from which the person resigned. (2) For 2 years after leaving or resigning from office, a former member of the Michigan senate or house of representatives shall not make expenditures for or receive compensation or reimbursement for actual expenses for lobbying that equal or exceed the limit established to require registration as a lobbyist agent. This subsection applies to a member whose term of office begins on or after January 1, 2027. (3) An individual who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. (4) Nothing in this section prevents a former member of the Michigan senate or house of representatives from taking a new position within state government or running for an elected office. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor